Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-643
Administrative fines; disposition; lien; collection.

(1) All money collected by the department pursuant to section 54-633 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(2) Any administrative fine levied pursuant to section 54-633 which remains unpaid for more than sixty days shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in a proper form of action in the name of the state in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property.

Laws 2007, LB12, § 9.